src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON /Amt__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Anbetracht__n_m 
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON /Angst__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Annalen__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Anschl/ag__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Anst/oß__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Anst/urm__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Anw/alt__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON /Apfel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Arbeits/amt__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Ärgernis__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCse/DATsen/GENse/NOMse ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENses/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATse ;

LEXICON Armut__n_f 
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON /Arsch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON /Arzt__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENs ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ärztin__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCnen/DATnen/GENnen/NOMnen ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON /Ast__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENs ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Aufsichtsr/at__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Auge__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Aus__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Ausk/unft__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Australien__n_nt 
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-GEN ; !! mit Artikel 
+N+Neu: SG-GENs ; !! ohne Artikel 
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ausw/uchs__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON /Axt__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON B/ach__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON B/ad__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Ballon__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Bambini__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON B/and__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON B/art__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON B/auch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENs ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON B/ausch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Bedrängnis__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCse/DATsen/GENse/NOMse ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Bel__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DATn/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Besitz__n_m 
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Bett__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0en-PL-CMP-L ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Bild__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCer/DATern/GENer/NOMer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Bisch/of__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: 0s-SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Bl/att__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Bl/och__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Bl/ock__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Blut__n_nt 
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON B/oden__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON B/ogen__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Böller__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACC/DATn/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Br/aut__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Br/uch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Br/uder__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Br/unst__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Br/ust__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON B/uch__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;
+N: Qer-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Buchstabe__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCn/DATn/GENns/NOM ;
+N: 0n-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON B/ug__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Bummel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON B/usch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Busine/ß__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DATe/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Causa__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Center__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DATn/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Champion__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ch/or__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Chromosom__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: 0en-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Comic__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Contest__n_m
!--FIXME-->
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Cordh/ut__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Coupe__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Fem: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON Coupe__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON D/ach__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON D/amm__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON D/ampf__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;
