src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns 
Persona:Persona Causa__n_f ;
Causa:Causa Causa__n_f ;
Coupe:Coupe Coupe__n_f ;
Order:Order Coupe__n_f ;
Ferien:Ferien Annalen__n_f ;
Spesen:Spesen Annalen__n_f ;
Besucherin:Besucherin Ärztin__n_f ;
Mitarbeiterin:Mitarbeiterin Ärztin__n_f ;
Befugnis:Befugnis Bedrängnis__n_f ;
Vorkenntnis:Vorkenntnis Bedrängnis__n_f ;
Unterkunft:Unterkunft Ausk/unft__n_f ;
Telefonauskunft:Telefonauskunft Ausk/unft__n_f ;
Angst:Angst /Angst__n_f ;
Höhenangst:Höhenangst /Angst__n_f ;
Handwerkskunst:Handwerkskunst Br/unst__n_f ;
Brunst:Brunst Br/unst__n_f ;
Lebenslust:Lebenslust Br/ust__n_f ;
Brust:Brust Br/ust__n_f ;
Schleimhaut:Schleimhaut Br/aut__n_f ;
Rothaut:Rothaut Br/aut__n_f ;
Armut:Armut Armut__n_f ;
Spracharmut:Spracharmut Armut__n_f ;
Axt:Axt /Axt__n_f ;
Streitaxt:Streitaxt /Axt__n_f ;
Comic:Comic Comic__n_m ;
Talk:Talk Comic__n_m ;
Zeitungsjunge:Zeitungsjunge Buchstabe__n_m ;
Nachname:Nachname Buchstabe__n_m ;
Coupe:Coupe Coupe__n_m ;
Schulhof:Schulhof Bisch/of__n_m ;
Klosterhof:Klosterhof Bisch/of__n_m ;
Krampf:Krampf D/ampf__n_m ;
Gegenvorschlag:Gegenvorschlag Anschl/ag__n_m ;
Ertrag:Ertrag Anschl/ag__n_m ;
Bug:Bug B/ug__n_m ;
Bach:Bach B/ach__n_m ;
Krach:Krach B/ach__n_m ;
Bloch:Bloch Bl/och__n_m ;
Arsch:Arsch /Arsch__n_m ;
Wolfsbarsch:Wolfsbarsch /Arsch__n_m ;
Busch:Busch B/usch__n_m ;
Rausch:Rausch B/ausch__n_m ;
Goldrausch:Goldrausch B/ausch__n_m ;
Umbruch:Umbruch Br/uch__n_m ;
Funkspruch:Funkspruch Br/uch__n_m ;
Brauch:Brauch B/auch__n_m ;
Sprachgebrauch:Sprachgebrauch B/auch__n_m ;
Block:Block Bl/ock__n_m ;
Notizblock:Notizblock Bl/ock__n_m ;
Zankapfel:Zankapfel /Apfel__n_m ;
Adamsapfel:Adamsapfel /Apfel__n_m ;
Bummel:Bummel Bummel__n_m ;
Pharao:Pharao Bummel__n_m ;
Taschenkamm:Taschenkamm D/amm__n_m ;
Stamm:Stamm D/amm__n_m ;
Funkturm:Funkturm Anst/urm__n_m ;
Wirbelsturm:Wirbelsturm Anst/urm__n_m ;
Erdboden:Erdboden B/oden__n_m ;
Lehmboden:Lehmboden B/oden__n_m ;
Rogen:Rogen B/ogen__n_m ;
Fragebogen:Fragebogen B/ogen__n_m ;
Champion:Champion Champion__n_m ;
Jus:Jus Champion__n_m ;
Thon:Thon Ballon__n_m ;
Sirup:Sirup Ballon__n_m ;
Halbbruder:Halbbruder Br/uder__n_m ;
Stiefbruder:Stiefbruder Br/uder__n_m ;
Böller:Böller Böller__n_m ;
Chor:Chor Ch/or__n_m ;
Fuchs:Fuchs Ausw/uchs__n_m ;
Auswuchs:Auswuchs Ausw/uchs__n_m ;
Beirat:Beirat Aufsichtsr/at__n_m ;
Vorrat:Vorrat Aufsichtsr/at__n_m ;
Populismus:Populismus Anbetracht__n_m ;
Fanatismus:Fanatismus Anbetracht__n_m ;
Staatsanwalt:Staatsanwalt Anw/alt__n_m ;
Rechtsanwalt:Rechtsanwalt Anw/alt__n_m ;
Bart:Bart B/art__n_m ;
Gast:Gast /Ast__n_m ;
Fahrgast:Fahrgast /Ast__n_m ;
Port:Port Contest__n_m ;
Contest:Contest Contest__n_m ;
Cordhut:Cordhut Cordh/ut__n_m ;
Sonnenhut:Sonnenhut Cordh/ut__n_m ;
Kinderarzt:Kinderarzt /Arzt__n_m ;
Hausarzt:Hausarzt /Arzt__n_m ;
Garaus:Garaus Besitz__n_m ;
Ersatz:Ersatz Besitz__n_m ;
Strafstoß:Strafstoß Anst/oß__n_m ;
Sprachverstoß:Sprachverstoß Anst/oß__n_m ;
Thermalbad:Thermalbad B/ad__n_nt ;
Lenkrad:Lenkrad B/ad__n_nt ;
Schmerzensgeld:Schmerzensgeld Bild__n_nt ;
Kerzenlicht:Kerzenlicht Bild__n_nt ;
Hundehalsband:Hundehalsband B/and__n_nt ;
Hochland:Hochland B/and__n_nt ;
Auge:Auge Auge__n_nt ;
Volksinteresse:Volksinteresse Auge__n_nt ;
Schutzdach:Schutzdach D/ach__n_nt ;
Postfach:Postfach D/ach__n_nt ;
Beutelbuch:Beutelbuch B/uch__n_nt ;
Kirchenbuch:Kirchenbuch B/uch__n_nt ;
Büromöbel:Büromöbel Bambini__n_nt ;
Extras:Extras Bambini__n_nt ;
Bel:Bel Bel__n_nt ;
Prion:Prion Chromosom__n_nt ;
Elektron:Elektron Chromosom__n_nt ;
Südafrika:Südafrika Australien__n_nt ;
Center:Center Center__n_nt ;
Bündnis:Bündnis Ärgernis__n_nt ;
Geschehnis:Geschehnis Ärgernis__n_nt ;
Gros:Gros Aus__n_nt ;
Schwarz:Schwarz Aus__n_nt ;
Gesundheitsamt:Gesundheitsamt /Amt__n_nt ;
Postamt:Postamt /Amt__n_nt ;
Arbeitsamt:Arbeitsamt Arbeits/amt__n_nt ;
Patentamt:Patentamt Arbeits/amt__n_nt ;
Baumblatt:Baumblatt Bl/att__n_nt ;
Wochenblatt:Wochenblatt Bl/att__n_nt ;
Nachthemd:Nachthemd Bett__n_nt ;
Sterbebett:Sterbebett Bett__n_nt ;
Kopfweh:Kopfweh Blut__n_nt ;
Abhorchen:Abhorchen Blut__n_nt ;
Busineß:Busineß Busine/ß__n_nt ;
Geheiß:Geheiß Busine/ß__n_nt ;
